Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 1 General Provisions

46-9-1.
Standard of care for carriers and common carriers; presumption of negligence by common carriers arising from loss of goods.

Carriers as such are bound to exercise ordinary diligence. Common carriers as such are bound to use extraordinary diligence, and in cases of loss the presumption of law is against them, and no excuse avails them unless the loss was occasioned by the act of God or the public enemies of the state.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 2038, 2039; Code 1868, §§ 2039, 2040; Code 1873, §§ 2065, 2066; Code 1882, §§ 2065, 2066; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2263, 2264; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2711, 2712; Code 1933, § 18-102.

Cross references.

Standard of care for carriers who issue bills of lading, §

11-7-309

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on law of torts, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 395 (1991).

46-9-2.
Power of common carrier to limit liability.

A common carrier may not limit his legal liability by any notice given either by publication or by entry on receipts given or tickets sold, provided that a common carrier may limit his liability by means of an express contract; provided, however, that a motor common carrier of household goods and office furnishings may require a shipper to declare a lump sum value for the shipment prior to loading or accept the per pound released value as provided in the terms of the bill of lading contract for the purpose of limiting its liability.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2041; Code 1868, § 2042; Code 1873, § 2068; Code 1882, § 2068; Civil Code 1895, § 2276; Civil Code 1910, § 2726; Code 1933, § 18-104; Ga. L. 1984, p. 693, § 1.

Cross references.

Limitation of carrier’s liability by express provision in document of title, §

11-7-309

.

Unenforceability of indemnification contracts holding indemnitee harmless from liability for its own negligence, §

13-8-2(b)

.

46-9-3.
Showings required by common carrier as prerequisite to use of exceptions under Code Sections 46-9-1 and 46-9-2.

In order for a common carrier to avail himself of the act of God exception under Code Section 46-9-1 or the contractual exception under Code Section 46-9-2, he must establish not only that the act of God or the contractually excepted fact ultimately occasioned the loss but that his own negligence did not contribute thereto.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 2265; Civil Code 1910, § 2713; Code 1933, § 18-103.

46-9-4.
Liability of common carrier corporation for acts committed outside of scope of charter.

In all cases where persons are injured or property is damaged by any corporation engaged as a common carrier in the transportation of freight or passengers, or both, either by land or by water, such corporation shall be liable to pay damages to anyone whose person or property may be so injured or damaged, notwithstanding the fact that such corporation was acting outside of the scope of its charter at the time of the injury or damage, if such corporation would be liable for such damages if it had been acting within its chartered powers and authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 136, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2277; Civil Code 1910, § 2728; Code 1933, § 18-105.

46-9-5.
Limitation of actions by common carriers for recovery of charges.

All actions at law by common carriers operating in this state for the recovery of their charges or any part thereof, where such charges have accrued in connection with intrastate shipments, shall be initiated within three years after the time the cause of action accrues, and not thereafter.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 191, § 1; Code 1933, § 18-601; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

Law reviews.

For article, “Statutes of Limitation: Counterproductive Complexities,” see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (1985).

46-9-6.
[Reserved] Limitation of actions against carriers for recovery of overcharges; requirements regarding rates, charges, and claims for loss or damage.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 191, § 2; Code 1933, § 18-602; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 46; Ga. L. 1996, p. 950, § 5; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 580, § 17/HB 865, effective July 1, 2012.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 580, § 17/HB 865 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2012.

46-9-7.
Time of accrual of actions under Code Section 46-9-5.

For the purposes of Code Section 46-9-5, the cause of action in respect of a shipment of property shall be deemed to accrue upon delivery or tender of delivery thereof by the carrier, and not thereafter.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 191, § 2; Code 1933, § 18-603; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 46/HB 323.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5 in 2017, “Code Section 46-9-5” was substituted for “Code Section 46-9-6” in the heading and text.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Code Section 46-9-6,” for “Code Sections 46-9-5 and 46-9-6,” near the beginning of this Code section.

46-9-8.
Requiring specific bonding company as surety.

No common carrier authorized to do business in this state, when requiring of any employee that he give bond or undertaking of any nature whatsoever, shall require as surety thereon any specific or certain bonding company, provided that nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prevent any common carrier from specifying the form or wording of such bond.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1912, p. 159, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 103-601, 103-9901.

46-9-9.
Right of employee or surety to cancel bond; notice of cancellation.

Any employee who gives any bond or undertaking pursuant to Code Section 46-9-8 shall, upon the breach of any of the conditions thereof by the other party thereto, have the power to cancel the same by giving the surety thereon and the common carrier for whose benefit the same has been given at least ten days’ notice in writing, setting out in full the reasons for canceling same. Any such notice to a company, corporation, or association may be served by leaving the same with any person on whom service of legal process upon such company, corporation, or association may be had.

Any surety on any such bond or undertaking shall, upon the breach of any of the conditions thereof by the employee for whom the bond or undertaking was made, have power to cancel the same by giving such employee at least ten days’ notice in writing, setting out in full the reasons for canceling same, the notice to be signed by an agent or manager of such surety, provided that nothing in this Code section shall affect any right of action accruing to any person upon the breach of the contract.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1912, p. 159, § 2; Code 1933, §§ 103-602, 103-9901.